Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1277
Acquisition of motorboat; requirements.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no
person acquiring a motorboat from the owner thereof, whether the owner is
a manufacturer, importer, dealer, or otherwise, shall acquire any right, title,
claim, or interest in or to such motorboat until he or she has physical possession
of the motorboat and a certificate of title or a manufacturer's or importer's
certificate with assignments on the certificate to show title in the purchaser
or an instrument in writing required by section 37-1281. No waiver or estoppel
shall operate in favor of such person against a person having physical possession
of the motorboat and the certificate of title, the manufacturer's or importer's
certificate, or an instrument in writing required by section 37-1281. No court
in any case at law or in equity shall recognize the right, title, claim, or
interest of any person in or to any motorboat sold, disposed of, mortgaged,
or encumbered unless there is compliance with this section.

(2) A motorboat manufactured before November 1, 1972, is exempt from
the requirement to have a certificate of title. If a person acquiring a motorboat
which is exempt from the requirement to have a certificate of title desires
to acquire a certificate of title for the motorboat, the person may apply
for a certificate of title pursuant to section 37-1278.

(3) A motorboat owned by the United States, the State of Nebraska, or
an agency or political subdivision of either is exempt from the requirement
to have a certificate of title. A person other than an agency or political
subdivision acquiring such a motorboat which is not covered under subsection
(2) of this section shall apply for a certificate of title pursuant to section
37-1278. The person shall show proof of purchase from a governmental agency
or political subdivision to obtain a certificate of title.

(4) Beginning on the
implementation date of the electronic title and lien system designated by
the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 37-1282, an electronic
certificate of title record shall be evidence of an owner's right, title,
claim, or interest in a motorboat.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 3.